Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Provisions Applicable Where Coroner is Medical Doctor
[Repealed]

§§ 19-21-51 through 19-21-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1986, ch. 459, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§19-21-51. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3909-01, 3909-05, 3909-13; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, §§ 1, 5, 13, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-53. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-02; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 2, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-55. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-03; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 3; Laws, 1971, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after March 16, 1971]

§19-21-57. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3909-03, 3909-04; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after March 16, 1971]

§19-21-59. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-06; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 6, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-61. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-07; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 7, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-63. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-08; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 8, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-65. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-11; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 11, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-67. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-09; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 9, eff from and after September 1, 1968]

§19-21-69. [Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 10, eff from and after September 1, 1968].

§19-21-71. [Codes, 1942, § 3909-12; Laws, 1968, ch. 518, § 12, eff from and after September 1, 1968]